Hawaii statutes.
[§8-16.2] Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi
Day. October 2 of each year shall be known and designated as
"Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi Day"; provided that this day is not and
shall not be construed to be a state holiday. [L 2015, c 5, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next